Washington statutes.
RCW 19.98.912

Effective date—Application—1990 c 124.

This act shall take effect July 1, 1990, and shall apply to all dealer agreements then in effect that have no expiration date and are a continuing agreement and to all other dealer agreements entered into or renewed on or after July 1, 1990.

[ 1990 c 124 s 9.]